Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. State Sales Tax
Natural gas sale by oil company to another company for fuel was sale for purpose of manufacturing and exempt from tax, where purchaser contracted with seller to put gas through a process of manufacture. State Bd. of Equalization v. Argo Oil Corp., 54 Wyo. 512, 94 P.2d 158,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1939).

Crude oil

sold by oil company to another company as fuel for generating electricity was a sale for purpose of manufacturing and not subject to this article. State Bd. of Equalization v. Stanolind Oil & Gas Co., 54 Wyo. 521, 94 P.2d 147,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1939).

Sale of crude oil by an oil company at a fixed price to light and power producers, for generating electric energy by them, was “fuel” for “manufacturing,” and hence not taxable. State Bd. of Equalization v. Stanolind Oil & Gas Co., 54 Wyo. 521, 94 P.2d 147,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1939).

Coal. —

Intrastate services of a railroad transporting coal from the mine to a company which delivers it to its customers by truck, are a wholesale transaction not subject to tax, as the transportation may be considered a part of the “process” of furnishing. State v. Capital Coal Co., 54 Wyo. 176, 88 P.2d 481,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1939).

Bankruptcy liquidation sales were not exempt from state excise tax.

In re Sunrise Constr. Co., 39 B.R. 668, 1984 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16099 (D. Wyo. 1984), disapproved, In re Cusato Bros. International, Inc., 750 F.2d 887, 1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 27534 (11th Cir. Fla. 1985).

Competitive baseball activities for youth deemed “charitable.” —

A nonprofit corporation promoting and financing competitive baseball activities for youth qualified as a “charitable” organization under subsection (a)(xiv), where all young persons who desired an opportunity to play organized baseball were allowed the chance to try out for a team. Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Casper Legion Baseball Club, 767 P.2d 608,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1989).

Commerce clause. —

Sales tax exemption under this section did not apply to a Utah company; there was no violation of the Commerce Clause since the taxpayer's connection to Wyoming was substantially more than the shipping of goods by a non-resident seller, and the taxpayer had a tax license and collected taxes on similar transactions. Moreover, the shipments to customers in Wyoming constituted taxable destination sales where the evidence showed a delivery address in Wyoming, inspection took place at the destination point, Utah taxes were not collected, and Wyoming taxes had been collected in similar cases.
Buehner Block Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 90, 139 P.3d 1150,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2006).

Quoted

in

United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Excise Tax Div., 713 P.2d 217,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 456

(Wyo. 1986); Memorial Hosp. v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 770 P.2d 223,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

State Bd. of Equalization v. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc., 611 P.2d 805,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1980).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sales tax as within tax exemption provision of statutes other than those imposing such taxes, 1 ALR2d 465.

Sales tax on parts, repairs or constituents used in repair of article, 11 ALR2d 926.

Exemption of casual, isolated or occasional sales, 42 ALR3d 292.

Exemption of charitable or educational organization from sales or use tax, 53 ALR3d 748.

Religious organization's exemption from sales or use tax, 54 ALR3d 1204.

Sales and use taxes on leased tangible personal property, 2 ALR4th 859.

What constitutes direct use within meaning of statute exempting from sales and use taxes equipment directly used in production of tangible personal property, 3 ALR4th 1129.

Cable television equipment or services as subject to sales or use tax, 5 ALR4th 754.

Eyeglasses or other optical accessories as subject to sales or use tax, 14 ALR4th 1370.

Exemption, from sales or use tax, of water, oil, gas, other fuel, or electricity provided for residential purposes, 15 ALR4th 269.

What constitutes newspapers, magazines, periodicals, or the like, under sales or use tax law exemption, 25 ALR4th 750.

Mining exemption to sales or use tax, 47 ALR4th 1229.

Validity, construction and application of state laws imposing tax or license fee on possession, sale, or the like, or illegal narcotics, 12 ALR5th 89.

Architectural drawings or illustrations as exempt from sales or use tax, 27 ALR5th 794.

Sales and use tax exemption for medical supplies, 30 ALR5th 494.

Exemption of charitable or educational organization from sales or use tax, 69 ALR5th 477.

Parts and supplies used in repair as subject to sales and use taxes, 113 ALR5th 313.